Illinois, session 104th, HB5495.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Common Interest Community Association Act 5is amended by changing Section 1-30 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 160/1-30)7    Sec. 1-30. Board duties and obligations; records. 8    (a) The board shall meet at least 4 times annually. 9    (b) A common interest community association may not enter 10into a contract with a current board member, or with a 11corporation, limited liability company, or partnership in 12which a board member or a member of his or her immediate family 13has 25% or more interest, unless notice of intent to enter into 14the contract is given to members within 20 days after a 15decision is made to enter into the contract and the members are 16afforded an opportunity by filing a petition, signed by 20% of 17the membership, for an election to approve or disapprove the 18contract; such petition shall be filed within 20 days after 19such notice and such election shall be held within 30 days 20after filing the petition. For purposes of this subsection, a 21board member's immediate family means the board member's 22spouse, parents, siblings, and children.23    (c) The bylaws or operating agreement shall provide for   HB5495- 2 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1the maintenance, repair, and replacement of the common areas 2and payments therefor, including the method of approving 3payment vouchers.4    (d) (Blank).5    (e) The association may engage the services of a manager 6or management company.7    (f) The association shall have one class of membership 8unless the declaration, bylaws, or operating agreement provide 9otherwise; however, this subsection (f) shall not be construed 10to limit the operation of subsection (c) of Section 1-20 of 11this Act.12    (g) The board shall have the power, after notice and an 13opportunity to be heard, to levy and collect reasonable fines 14from members or unit owners for violations of the declaration, 15bylaws, operating agreement, and rules and regulations of the 16common interest community association.17    (h) Other than attorney's fees and court or arbitration 18costs, no fees pertaining to the collection of a member's or 19unit owner's financial obligation to the association, 20including fees charged by a manager or managing agent, shall 21be added to and deemed a part of a member's or unit owner's 22respective share of the common expenses unless: (i) the 23managing agent fees relate to the costs to collect common 24expenses for the association; (ii) the fees are set forth in a 25contract between the managing agent and the association; and 26(iii) the authority to add the management fees to a member's or   HB5495- 3 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1unit owner's respective share of the common expenses is 2specifically stated in the declaration, bylaws, or operating 3agreement of the association.4    (i) Board records.5        (1) The board shall maintain the following records of 6    the association and make them available for examination 7    and copying at convenient hours of weekdays by any current 8    or prospective member or unit owner in a common interest 9    community subject to the authority of the board, their 10    mortgagees, and their duly authorized agents or attorneys:11            (i) Copies of the recorded declaration, other 12        community instruments, other duly recorded covenants 13        and bylaws and any amendments, articles of 14        incorporation, articles of organization, annual 15        reports, and any rules and regulations adopted by the 16        board shall be available. Prior to the organization of 17        the board, the developer shall maintain and make 18        available the records set forth in this paragraph (i) 19        for examination and copying.20            (ii) All financial records for the last 7 years. 21        Financial records include, but are not limited to, the 22        income statement, balance sheet, check register, 23        current budget with monthly variation, detailed 24        records of receipts and expenditures affecting the 25        operation and administration of the association, 26        reserve account details, tax returns and other   HB5495- 4 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1        appropriate accounting records. Detailed and accurate 2        records in chronological order of the receipts and 3        expenditures affecting the common areas, specifying 4        and itemizing the maintenance and repair expenses of 5        the common areas and any other expenses incurred, and 6        copies of all contracts, leases, or other agreements 7        entered into by the board shall be maintained.8            (iii) The minutes of all meetings of the board 9        which shall be maintained for not less than 7 years.10            (iv) With a written statement of a proper purpose, 11        ballots and proxies related thereto, if any, for any 12        election held for the board and for any other matters 13        voted on by the members, which shall be maintained for 14        not less than one year.15            (v) With a written statement of a proper purpose, 16        such other records of the board as are available for 17        inspection by members of a not-for-profit corporation 18        pursuant to Section 107.75 of the General Not For 19        Profit Corporation Act of 1986 shall be maintained.20            (vi) With respect to units owned by a land trust, a 21        living trust, or other legal entity, the trustee, 22        officer, or manager of the entity may designate, in 23        writing, a person to cast votes on behalf of the member 24        or unit owner and a designation shall remain in effect 25        until a subsequent document is filed with the 26        association.  HB5495- 5 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1            (vii) Any reserve study. 2        (2) Where a request for records under this subsection 3    is made in writing to the board or its agent, failure to 4    provide the requested record or to respond within 30 days 5    shall be deemed a denial by the board.6        (3) A reasonable fee may be charged by the board for 7    the cost of retrieving and copying records properly 8    requested.9        (4) If the board fails to provide records properly 10    requested under paragraph (1) of this subsection (i) 11    within the time period provided in that paragraph (1), the 12    member may seek appropriate relief and shall be entitled 13    to an award of reasonable attorney's fees and costs if the 14    member prevails and the court finds that such failure is 15    due to the acts or omissions of the board of managers or 16    the board of directors.17    (j) The board shall have standing and capacity to act in a 18representative capacity in relation to matters involving the 19common areas or more than one unit, on behalf of the members or 20unit owners as their interests may appear.21    (k) The board may contract with the highway commissioner 22of a road district in which the association is located, if the 23association comprises 50% of the population or greater of the 24township or road district, to furnish materials related to the 25maintenance or repair of roads. Any such purchases shall be 26included in the board's finance report as outlined in Section   HB5495- 6 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b11-45. 2(Source: P.A. 102-921, eff. 5-27-22; 103-486, eff. 1-1-24.) 3    Section 10. The Condominium Property Act is amended by 4changing Section 19 as follows: 5    (765 ILCS 605/19)  (from Ch. 30, par. 319)6    Sec. 19. Records of the association; availability for 7examination. 8    (a) The board of managers of every association shall keep 9and maintain the following records, or true and complete 10copies of these records, at the association's principal 11office:12        (1) the association's declaration, bylaws, and plats 13    of survey, and all amendments of these;14        (2) the rules and regulations of the association, if 15    any;16        (3) if the association is incorporated as a 17    corporation, the articles of incorporation of the 18    association and all amendments to the articles of 19    incorporation;20        (4) minutes of all meetings of the association and its 21    board of managers for the immediately preceding 7 years;22        (5) all current policies of insurance of the 23    association;24        (6) all contracts, leases, and other agreements then   HB5495- 7 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1    in effect to which the association is a party or under 2    which the association or the unit owners have obligations 3    or liabilities;4        (7) a current listing of the names, addresses, email 5    addresses, telephone numbers, and weighted vote of all 6    members entitled to vote;7        (8) ballots and proxies related to ballots for all 8    matters voted on by the members of the association during 9    the immediately preceding 12 months, including, but not 10    limited to, the election of members of the board of 11    managers; 12        (9) the books and records for the association's 13    current and 10 immediately preceding fiscal years, 14    including, but not limited to, itemized and detailed 15    records of all receipts, expenditures, and accounts; and16        (10) any reserve study.17    (b) Any current or prospective member of an association 18shall have the right to inspect, examine, and make copies of 19the records described in subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), 20(6), (9), and (10) of subsection (a) of this Section, in person 21or by agent, at any reasonable time or times, at the 22association's principal office. In order to exercise this 23right, a member must submit a written request to the 24association's board of managers or its authorized agent, 25stating with particularity the records sought to be examined. 26Failure of an association's board of managers to make   HB5495- 8 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1available all records so requested within 10 business days of 2receipt of the member's written request shall be deemed a 3denial.4    Any member who prevails in an enforcement action to compel 5examination of records described in subdivisions (1), (2), 6(3), (4), (5), (6), (9), and (10) of subsection (a) of this 7Section shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney's 8fees and costs from the association.9    (c) (Blank).10    (d) (Blank).11    (d-5) As used in this Section, "commercial purpose" means 12the use of any part of a record or records described in 13subdivisions (7) and (8) of subsection (a) of this Section, or 14information derived from such records, in any form for sale, 15resale, or solicitation or advertisement for sales or 16services. 17    (e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this 18Section, any member of an association shall have the right to 19inspect, examine, and make copies of the records described in 20subdivisions (7) and (8) of subsection (a) of this Section, in 21person or by agent, at any reasonable time or times but only 22for a purpose that relates to the association, at the 23association's principal office. In order to exercise this 24right, a member must submit a written request, to the 25association's board of managers or its authorized agent, 26stating with particularity the records sought to be examined.   HB5495- 9 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1As a condition for exercising this right, the board of 2managers or authorized agent of the association may require 3the member to certify in writing that the information 4contained in the records obtained by the member will not be 5used by the member for any commercial purpose or for any 6purpose that does not relate to the association. The board of 7managers of the association may impose a fine in accordance 8with item (l) of Section 18.4 upon any person who makes a false 9certification. Subject to the provisions of subsection (g) of 10this Section, failure of an association's board of managers to 11make available all records so requested within 10 business 12days of receipt of the member's written request shall be 13deemed a denial; provided, however, that the board of managers 14of an association that has adopted a secret ballot election 15process as provided in Section 18 of this Act shall not be 16deemed to have denied a member's request for records described 17in subdivision (8) of subsection (a) of this Section if voting 18ballots, without identifying unit numbers, are made available 19to the requesting member within 10 business days of receipt of 20the member's written request.21    Any member who prevails in an enforcement action to compel 22examination of records described in subdivision (7) or (8) of 23subsection (a) of this Section shall be entitled to recover 24reasonable attorney's fees and costs from the association only 25if the court finds that the board of directors acted in bad 26faith in denying the member's request.  HB5495- 10 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1    (f) The actual cost to the association of retrieving and 2making requested records available for inspection and 3examination under this Section may be charged by the 4association to the requesting member. If a member requests 5copies of records requested under this Section, the actual 6costs to the association of reproducing the records may also 7be charged by the association to the requesting member.8    (g) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (e) of 9this Section, unless otherwise directed by court order, an 10association need not make the following records available for 11inspection, examination, or copying by its members:12        (1) documents relating to appointment, employment, 13    discipline, or dismissal of association employees;14        (2) documents relating to actions pending against or 15    on behalf of the association or its board of managers in a 16    court or administrative tribunal;17        (3) documents relating to actions threatened against, 18    or likely to be asserted on behalf of, the association or 19    its board of managers in a court or administrative 20    tribunal;21        (4) documents relating to common expenses or other 22    charges owed by a member other than the requesting member; 23    and24        (5) documents provided to an association in connection 25    with the lease, sale, or other transfer of a unit by a 26    member other than the requesting member.  HB5495- 11 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1    (h) The provisions of this Section are applicable to all 2condominium instruments recorded under this Act. Any portion 3of a condominium instrument that contains provisions contrary 4to these provisions shall be void as against public policy and 5ineffective. Any condominium instrument that fails to contain 6the provisions required by this Section shall be deemed to 7incorporate the provisions by operation of law.8(Source: P.A. 102-921, eff. 5-27-22.) 9    Section 15. The Condominium and Common Interest Community 10Ombudsperson Act is amended by changing Sections 20 and 40 and 11by adding Section 41 as follows: 12    (765 ILCS 615/20)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)14    Sec. 20. Office of the Condominium and Common Interest 15Community Ombudsperson. 16    (a) There is created in the Division of Real Estate within 17the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, under 18the supervision and control of the Secretary, the Office of 19the Condominium and Common Interest Community Ombudsperson. 20    (b) The Department shall name an Ombudsperson and other 21persons as necessary to discharge the requirements of this 22Act. The Ombudsperson shall have the powers delegated to him 23or her by the Department, in addition to the powers set forth 24in this Act.   HB5495- 12 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1    (c) Neither the Ombudsperson nor the Department shall have 2any authority to consider matters that may constitute grounds 3for charges or complaints under the Illinois Human Rights Act 4or that are properly brought before the Department of Human 5Rights or the Illinois Human Rights Commission, before a 6comparable department or body established by a county, 7municipality, or township pursuant to an ordinance prohibiting 8discrimination and established for the purpose of 9investigating and adjudicating charges or complaints of 10discrimination under the ordinance, or before a federal agency 11or commission that administers and enforces federal 12anti-discrimination laws and investigates and adjudicates 13charges or complaints of discrimination under such laws. 14    (d) (Blank.) Information and advice provided by the 15Ombudsperson has no binding legal effect and is not subject to 16the provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.17(Source: P.A. 98-1135, eff. 1-1-17 (See Section 20 of P.A. 1899-776 for effective date of P.A. 98-1135); 99-776, eff. 198-12-16.) 20    (765 ILCS 615/40)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2029)22    Sec. 40. Dispute resolution. 23    (a) Beginning on July 1, 2020, and subject to 24appropriation, unit owners meeting the requirements of this 25Section may make a written request, as outlined in subsection   HB5495- 13 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1(f) of this Section, to the Ombudsperson for assistance in 2resolving a dispute between a unit owner and an association 3that involves a violation of the Condominium Property Act or 4the Common Interest Community Association Act. 5    (b) The Ombudsperson shall not accept requests for 6resolutions of disputes with community association managers, 7supervising community association managers, or community 8association management firms, as defined in the Community 9Association Manager Licensing and Disciplinary Act. 10    (c) The Ombudsperson shall not accept requests for 11resolutions of disputes for which there is a pending complaint 12filed in any court or administrative tribunal in any 13jurisdiction or for which arbitration or alternative dispute 14resolution is scheduled to occur or has previously occurred. 15    (d) The assistance described in subsection (a) of this 16Section is available only to unit owners. In order for a unit 17owner to receive the assistance from the Ombudsperson 18described in subsection (a) of this Section, the unit owner 19must: 20        (1) owe no outstanding assessments, fees, or funds to 21    the association, unless the assessments, fees, or funds 22    are central to the dispute; 23        (2) allege a dispute that was initiated, or initially 24    occurred, within the 2 calendar years preceding the date 25    of the request; 26        (3) have made a written complaint pursuant to the unit   HB5495- 14 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1    owner's association's complaint policy, as outlined in 2    Section 35, which alleged violations of the Condominium 3    Property Act or the Common Interest Community Association 4    Act; 5        (4) have received a final and adverse decision from 6    the association and attach a copy of the association's 7    final adverse decision marked "final" to the request to 8    the Ombudsperson; and 9        (5) have filed the request within 30 days after the 10    receipt of the association's final adverse decision. 11    (e) A unit owner who has not received a response, marked 12"final", to his or her complaint from the association within a 13reasonable time may request assistance from the Ombudsperson 14pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section if the unit owner 15meets the requirements of items (1), (2), and (3) of 16subsection (d) of this Section. A unit owner may not request 17assistance from the Ombudsperson until at least 90 days after 18the initial written complaint was submitted to the 19association. The Ombudsperson may decline a unit owner's 20request for assistance on the basis that a reasonable time has 21not yet passed. 22    (f) The request for assistance shall be in writing, on 23forms provided electronically by the Office, and include the 24following: 25        (1) the name, address, and contact information of the 26    unit owner;   HB5495- 15 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1        (2) the name, address, and contact information of the 2    association; 3        (3) the applicable association governing documents 4    unless the absence of governing documents is central to 5    the dispute; 6        (4) the date of the final adverse decision by the 7    association; 8        (5) a copy of the association's written complaint 9    policy required under Section 35 of this Act; 10        (6) a copy of the unit owner's complaint to the 11    association with a specific reference to the alleged 12    violations of the Condominium Property Act or the Common 13    Interest Community Association Act; 14        (7) documentation verifying the unit owner's ownership 15    of a unit, such as a copy of a recorded deed or other 16    document conferring title; and 17        (8) a copy of the association's adverse decision 18    marked "final", if applicable. 19    (g) On receipt of a unit owner's request for assistance 20that the Department determines meets the requirements of this 21Section, the Ombudsperson shall, within the limits of the 22available resources, confer with the interested parties and 23assist in efforts to resolve the dispute by mutual agreement 24of the parties. 25    (h) (Blank). The Ombudsperson shall assist only opposing 26parties who mutually agree to participate in dispute   HB5495- 16 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1resolution. 2    (i) A unit owner is limited to one request for assistance 3per dispute. The meaning of dispute is to be broadly 4interpreted by the Department. 5    (j) The Department has the authority to determine whether 6or not a final decision is adverse under paragraph (4) of 7subsection (d) of this Section. 8    (k) The Department shall, on or before July 1, 2020, 9establish rules describing the time limit, method, and manner 10for dispute resolution. 11    (l) (Blank). 12(Source: P.A. 98-1135, eff. 1-1-17 (See Section 20 of P.A. 1399-776 for effective date of P.A. 98-1135); 99-776, eff. 148-12-16.) 15    (765 ILCS 615/41 new)16    Sec. 41. Ombudsperson investigation. 17    (a) If the Ombudsperson is unable to resolve the complaint 18through the dispute resolution process, the Ombudsperson may 19investigate the complaint. Complainants and respondents must 20cooperate with the Ombudsperson in the course of the dispute 21resolution and investigation. Failure to cooperate with the 22Ombudsperson is a violation of this Act. If a party fails to 23furnish specified records under this Section, or if otherwise 24necessary, the Department may issue a subpoena to the party. 25The Department must examine the issues and the records, make   HB5495- 17 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1findings of fact and conclusions of law, and issue to the 2parties a written determination in response to the complaint. 3The determination is binding on both the parties subject to 4administrative review.5    (b) If the Department finds by written determination that 6a violation of this Act has occurred, the Department must 7include in the written determination the action required to 8cure the violation, the time within which that action must be 9taken, the penalties that will be imposed if that action is not 10taken within the specified time period, and the ability to 11contest the determination by means of an administrative 12hearing. If the respondent requests an administrative hearing, 13the respondent must provide written notice to the Ombudsperson 14within 7 business days.15    (c) If the Department finds by written determination that 16a violation of this act has not occurred, the Department shall 17include the basis for the Department's determination and the 18ability to contest the determination by means of an 19administrative hearing. If the complainant requests an 20administrative hearing, the complainant shall provide written 21notice to the Ombudsperson within 7 business days.22    (d) The respondent must comply with the requirements of a 23written determination from the Department within seven days 24after the notice of violation is received. If a respondent 25fails to comply with the requirements of a notice of violation 26within the required time period, and the Department has not   HB5495- 18 -LRB104 19591 JRC 33039 b1received written notice of the respondent's request for an 2administrative hearing, the Department may impose a penalty, 3up to a maximum of $5,000 per violation per day, for each day 4that a violation remains uncorrected. When determining the 5amount of the penalty to impose, the Ombudspersons must 6consider the severity and duration of the violation and the 7impact of the violation on other residents of the association. 8If the respondent shows, upon timely application to the 9Ombudsperson, that a good-faith effort to comply with the 10requirements of the written determination has been made and 11that the respondent has not complied because of mitigating 12factors beyond the respondent's control, the Ombudsperson may 13delay or dismiss the imposition of the penalty.